Maine, session 132, LD1592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3202, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 398, Pt. B, §1, is
amended to read:
5. International transmission contracts. Notwithstanding section 3204,
transmission Transmission and distribution utilities, including consumer-owned utilities,
that operate or manage a portion of the grid connected to the New England grid by
transmission lines that pass through Canada may enter into commercially reasonable
contracts with Canadian electric utilities for the purchase of back-up services, tie-line
interruption services, ancillary services, transmission services or any other service that
promotes effective retail electric competition in northern Maine. The transmission and
distribution utilities shall make all such contract services available to competitive
electricity providers at cost, on an equitable basis. Commission approval of such contracts
is not required. Nothing in this This subsection exempts does not exempt from commission
jurisdiction utility operations or activities undertaken pursuant to such contracts.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3204, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3204, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3204, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 287, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3204, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Generation assets ownership permitted. After March 1, 2026, an investor-
owned transmission and distribution utility may own, have a financial interest in or
otherwise control generation or generation-related assets in accordance with rules adopted
by the commission pursuant to this subsection. The commission shall adopt rules to
establish terms, conditions and standards of conduct that:
A. Provide that the ratepayers of an investor-owned transmission and distribution
utility are not responsible for the costs of that investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility's generation or generation-related assets except as approved by the
commission;
B. Require the accounts and records of the investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility to be kept separate from the accounts and records associated with
any generation or generation-related assets owned by the utility; and
C. Protect ratepayers.
The commission's rules may also establish standards of conduct applicable to the ownership
of generation or generation-related assets by an affiliate of an investor-owned transmission
and distribution utility. For purposes of this subsection, "affiliate" means a person who has
any direct or indirect ownership interest in, or is a direct or indirect subsidiary of a person
who has any ownership interest in, the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility,
but does not include a wholly owned or partially owned direct or indirect subsidiary of the
investor-owned transmission and distribution utility.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR0318(01)

Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3604, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 329, Pt. A, §4, is
amended to read:
1. Investor-owned transmission and distribution utilities; required participation.
Notwithstanding section 3204, the The commission may direct investor-owned
transmission and distribution utilities to enter into long-term contracts with program
participants located within the service territory of the utility for energy, capacity resources
or renewable energy credits. The commission may direct investor-owned transmission and
distribution utilities to enter into contracts under this subsection only as agents for their
customers and only in accordance with this section. An investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility shall sell energy, capacity resources or renewable energy credits
purchased pursuant to this subsection into the wholesale electricity market or take other
action relative to such energy, capacity resources or renewable energy credits as directed
by the commission.
Sec. 7. 35-A MRSA §3624, sub-§1, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 353,
§6, is amended to read:
1. Investor-owned transmission and distribution utilities; required participation.
Notwithstanding section 3204, the The commission may direct an investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility to enter into long-term contracts for energy with one
or more program participants if the program participant is:
A. Located within the service territory of the investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility; or
B. Located within the service territory of a consumer-owned transmission and
distribution utility if:
(1) The program participant delivers energy to a location within the service
territory of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility;
(2) The program participant does not sell energy to the consumer-owned
transmission and distribution utility in whose territory the program participant is
located; and
(3) The consumer-owned transmission and distribution utility consents to the sale
and transmission of that energy pursuant to a long-term contract.
The commission may direct investor-owned transmission and distribution utilities to enter
into contracts under this subsection only as agents for their customers and only in
accordance with this section. An investor-owned transmission and distribution utility shall
sell energy pursuant to this subsection into the wholesale electricity market or take other
action relative to that energy directed by the commission.